Utah statutes.
41-8-3.   Operation of vehicle by persons under 16 and six months --
Passenger limitations -- Exceptions -- Penalties.
(1)  In addition to the provisions of Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver
License Act, a person, whether resident or nonresident of this state, may not
operate a motor vehicle upon any highway of this state with any passenger who
is not an immediate family member of the driver until the earlier of:
(a)  six months from the date the person's driver license was issued; or
(b)  the person reaches 18 years of age.
(2)  It is an affirmative defense to a charge under Subsection (1) that the
person is operating a motor vehicle:
(a)  accompanied by a licensed driver at least 21 years of age who is
occupying a seat next to the driver;
(b)  on assignment of a farmer or rancher and the driver is engaged in an
agricultural operation; or
(c)  in an emergency.
(3)  In addition to any penalties imposed under Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform
Driver License Act, a violation of this section is a class C misdemeanor.
(4) (a)  Enforcement of this section by state or local law enforcement
officers shall be only as a secondary action when an operator of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of Title 41, other than
this section, or for another offense.
(b)  A peace officer may not seize or impound a vehicle if:
(i)  the operator of the vehicle is cited for a violation of this section; and
(ii)  the seizure or impoundment is not otherwise authorized under Section
41-1a-1101, 41-6a-1405, 41-6a-1608, or 73-18-20.1 or required under Section
41-6a-527.
